Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 1 PROGRAMS AND SERVICES
27-80-126. Recovery support services grant program - creation - eligibility - reporting requirements - appropriation - rules - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Grant program" means the recovery support services grant program created in this section.

"Recovery community organization" means an independent, nonprofit organization led and governed by representatives of local communities of recovery that organize recovery-focused policy advocacy activities, carry out recovery-focused community education and outreach programs, or provide peer-run recovery support services.

There is created in the behavioral health administration the recovery support services grant program, referred to in this section as the "grant program", to provide grants to recovery community organizations for the purpose of providing recovery-oriented services to individuals with a substance use disorder or co-occurring substance use and mental health disorder.

A recovery community organization that receives a grant from the grant program may use the money to:

Offer opportunities for individuals with a substance use disorder or co-occurring substance use and mental health disorder in recovery to engage in activities focused on mental or physical wellness or community service;

Provide guidance to individuals with a substance use disorder or co-occurring substance use and mental health disorder and their family members on navigating treatment, social service, and recovery support systems;

Help individuals with a substance use disorder or co-occurring substance use and mental health disorder to connect with resources needed to initiate and maintain recovery as outlined by the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration's four dimensions of recovery: Health, home, community, and purpose;

Assist in establishing and sustaining a social and physical environment supportive of recovery;

Provide local and state recovery resources to recovery community organization participants and community members; and

Provide recovery support services for caregivers and families of individuals recovering from a substance use and co-occurring mental health disorder.

The BHA shall administer the grant program. Subject to available appropriations, the BHA shall disburse grant money appropriated pursuant to subsection (8) of this section to each managed service organization designated pursuant to section 27-80-107.

The BHA shall implement the grant program in accordance with this section. Pursuant to article 4 of title 24, the BHA shall promulgate rules as necessary to implement the grant program.

To receive a grant, a recovery community organization must submit an application to the applicable managed service organization in accordance with rules promulgated by the BHA.

Each managed service organization shall review the applications received pursuant to this section. In awarding grants, the managed service organization shall prioritize an applicant whose program outlines the capacity to deliver recovery support services to meet the needs of diverse racial, cultural, income, ability, and other underserved groups, including the delivery of recovery support services by culturally responsive and trauma-informed professionals.

On or before December 1, 2023, and on or before December 1 each year thereafter, each managed service organization that awards grants shall submit a report to the BHA. At a minimum, the report must include the following information:

The number of community members involved in the recovery community organization;

A detailed description of the organization's advocacy efforts;

Any collaborative projects a recovery community organization has with other recovery community organizations across the state; and

Any other information required by the BHA.

On or before March 1, 2022, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter for the duration of the grant program, the BHA shall submit a summarized report on the grant program to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance and the public and behavioral health and human services committees of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, and to the opioid and other substance use disorders study committee created in section 10-22.3-101.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirements set forth in this subsection (7) continue indefinitely.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall appropriate one million six hundred thousand dollars from the general fund to the BHA to implement the grant program. The BHA may use a portion of the money appropriated for the grant program to pay the direct and indirect costs of administering the grant program.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2377, § 24, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(2), (4), (5), (6)(a), IP(7)(a), (7)(a)(IV), (7)(b), and (8) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1563, § 163, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-80-127. Children and youth in need of residential mental health and substance use treatment - repeal.

On or before July 1, 2023, the behavioral health administration, created pursuant to part 2 of article 60 of this title 27, shall create, develop, or contract to add additional residential substance use treatment beds for youth. To the greatest extent possible, the department shall ensure that both mental health and substance use treatment services are available in one residential location. The department shall work collaboratively with the behavioral health administration for licensing and determining the greatest areas of need.

For the 2022-23 budget year, the general assembly shall appropriate five million dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund, created pursuant to section 24-75-230, to the department to expand substance use residential treatment beds for adolescents, as described in subsection (1) of this section.
(2) (a) (I) For the 2022-23 budget year, the general assembly shall appropriate five million dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund, created pursuant to section 24-75-230, to the department to expand substance use residential treatment beds for adolescents, as described in subsection (1) of this section.

Money spent pursuant to this subsection (2) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as amended. The department shall either spend or obligate such appropriation prior to December 30, 2024, and expend the appropriation on or before December 31, 2026.

This subsection (2) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

The department of human services and any person that receives money from the department of human services shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This section is known as the "Andy Campos-Padilla Act".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1283), ch. 185, p. 1244, § 5, effective May 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1283, see section 1 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-80-128. Fentanyl education and treatment program.

The behavioral health administration shall develop a fentanyl education program for the purpose of sections 18-1.3-410 and 18-1.3-510. The fentanyl education program must include information regarding the nature and addictive elements of synthetic opiates, their dangers to a person's life and health, access to and administration of opiate antagonists and non-laboratory synthetic opiate detection tests, and laws regarding synthetic opiates, including criminal penalties and immunity for reporting an overdose event pursuant to section 18-1-711. The BHA may update the fentanyl education program curriculum as necessary.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1651, § 30, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 57(1)(b) of chapter 225 (HB 22-1326), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act adding this section takes effect only if HB 22-1278 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1278 or HB 22-1326, whichever is later. HB 22-1278 became law, and both bills have an effective date of July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1326 stating the purpose of, and the provision directing legislative staff agencies to conduct, a post-enactment review pursuant to § 2-2-1201 scheduled in 2025, see sections 1 and 55 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2022. To obtain a copy of the review, once completed, go to "Legislative Resources and Requirements" on the Colorado General Assembly's website.